Louisiana, session 2026, HB1164.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1581.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1581.1. Fuel gas alarms; residential dwellings
A. As used in this Section, the following terms have the following meanings:
(1) "Covered residential dwelling" means any single-family or multi-family
residence; or any structure, or room or group of rooms within a structure; used or
intended for residential purposes that contains one or more gas-fueled appliances and
has an active natural gas or liquefied propane gas service connection.
(2) "Fuel gas alarm" means a device designed to detect natural gas or
liquefied propane gas and provide an audible alarm, visual alarm, or combination
thereof, that is all of the following:
(a) Tested and listed by a nationally recognized independent testing
laboratory.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2723 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1164
(b) Conforms to Standard 1484 or Standard 2075 as published by
Underwriters Laboratories, or a successor nationally recognized standard.
(c) Installed in accordance with manufacturer instructions and applicable
safety standards.
B.(1) Covered residential dwellings shall have at least one fuel gas alarm
installed in any room containing a gas appliance.
(2) Fuel gas alarms shall be installed in accordance with manufacturer
installation instructions and with any rules promulgated by the fire marshal
consistent with nationally-recognized safety standards.
(3) Battery-powered or plug-in fuel gas alarms are permitted in existing
residential dwellings unless otherwise required by applicable building codes.
(4) Operators of licensed residential care facilities shall comply in
accordance with existing Louisiana Department of Health regulatory frameworks.
Nothing in this Section creates additional enforcement authority for residential care
facilities beyond existing health and safety regulations.
C.(1) The fire marshal may promulgate rules reasonably necessary to
implement this Section, including adoption of nationally recognized performance
standards, installation and placement guidance, and reasonable exemptions.
(2) Rules promulgated pursuant to this Section shall prioritize public
education and voluntary compliance. The fire marshal may collaborate with fire
departments, nonprofit fire safety organizations, or other stakeholders to develop
educational materials regarding the installation and maintenance of fuel gas alarms.
D.(1) This Section shall be enforced only in conjunction with existing
building inspections, fire safety inspections, or certificate of occupancy processes.
No inspection shall be conducted solely for the purpose of determining compliance
absent reasonable cause related to another safety concern.
(2) For a violation of this Section, a written warning shall be issued and a
reasonable opportunity to cure the violation shall be provided.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2723 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1164
E.(1) The provisions of this Section do not require interconnection, remote
monitoring, or system integration unless otherwise required pursuant to separate
building or fire codes.
(2) The provisions of this Section do not impose liability, fault, or regulatory
responsibility upon any public utility or gas service provider for conditions occurring
within privately owned property.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2030.